data/dictionaries/apertium/apertium-ell.ell.dix
    <pardef n="/άνοια__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>άνοια</l><r>άνοια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνοια</l><r>άνοια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνοιας</l><r>άνοια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνοια</l><r>άνοια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνοιες</l><r>άνοια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνοιες</l><r>άνοια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ανοιών</l><r>άνοια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνοιες</l><r>άνοια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κομμ/άτι__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>άτι</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτι</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ατιού</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτι</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτια</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτια</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ατιών</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτια</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/όσμιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>όσμιο</l><r>όσμιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όσμιο</l><r>όσμιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οσμίου</l><r>όσμιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όσμιο</l><r>όσμιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="καδ/ένα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ένα</l><r>ένα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένα</l><r>ένα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένας</l><r>ένα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένα</l><r>ένα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένες</l><r>ένα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένες</l><r>ένα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ενών</l><r>ένα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένες</l><r>ένα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ζ/ώνη__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ώνη</l><r>ώνη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνη</l><r>ώνη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνης</l><r>ώνη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνη</l><r>ώνη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνες</l><r>ώνη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνες</l><r>ώνη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωνών</l><r>ώνη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνες</l><r>ώνη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="β/άρκα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>άρκα</l><r>άρκα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρκα</l><r>άρκα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρκας</l><r>άρκα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρκα</l><r>άρκα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρκες</l><r>άρκα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρκες</l><r>άρκα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρκών</l><r>άρκα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρκες</l><r>άρκα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="β/ίζα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ίζα</l><r>ίζα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίζα</l><r>ίζα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίζας</l><r>ίζα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίζα</l><r>ίζα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίζες</l><r>ίζα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίζες</l><r>ίζα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιζών</l><r>ίζα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίζες</l><r>ίζα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="π/ίτσα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ίτσα</l><r>ίτσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτσα</l><r>ίτσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτσας</l><r>ίτσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτσα</l><r>ίτσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτσες</l><r>ίτσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτσες</l><r>ίτσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιτσών</l><r>ίτσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτσες</l><r>ίτσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="δι/άνυσμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>άνυσμα</l><r>άνυσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνυσμα</l><r>άνυσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ανύσματος</l><r>άνυσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνυσμα</l><r>άνυσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ανύσματα</l><r>άνυσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ανύσματα</l><r>άνυσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ανυσμάτων</l><r>άνυσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ανύσματα</l><r>άνυσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="απασχ/όληση__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>όληση</l><r>όληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όληση</l><r>όληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όλησης</l><r>όληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ολήσεως</l><r>όληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όληση</l><r>όληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ολήσεις</l><r>όληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ολήσεις</l><r>όληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ολήσεων</l><r>όληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ολήσεις</l><r>όληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="άνοια"><i></i><par n="/άνοια__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="απασχόληση"><i>απασχ</i><par n="απασχ/όληση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="βάρκα"><i>β</i><par n="β/άρκα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="βίζα"><i>β</i><par n="β/ίζα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="διάνυσμα"><i>δι</i><par n="δι/άνυσμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ζώνη"><i>ζ</i><par n="ζ/ώνη__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="καδένα"><i>καδ</i><par n="καδ/ένα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="κομμάτι"><i>κομμ</i><par n="κομμ/άτι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="μονοπάτι"><i>μονοπ</i><par n="κομμ/άτι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πίτσα"><i>π</i><par n="π/ίτσα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ρίζα"><i>ρ</i><par n="β/ίζα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="όσμιο"><i></i><par n="/όσμιο__n_nt"/></e>
